Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.095

Fiduciary duties.

(1) A mortgage broker has a fiduciary relationship with the borrower. For the purposes of this section, the fiduciary duty means that the mortgage broker has the following duties:

(a) A mortgage broker must act in the borrower's best interest and in the utmost good faith toward the borrower, and shall disclose any and all interests to the borrower including, but not limited to, interests that may lie with the lender that are used to facilitate a borrower's request. A mortgage broker shall not accept, provide, or charge any undisclosed compensation or realize any undisclosed remuneration that inures to the benefit of the mortgage broker on an expenditure made for the borrower;

(b) A mortgage broker must carry out all lawful instructions provided by the borrower;

(c) A mortgage broker must disclose to the borrower all material facts of which the mortgage broker has knowledge that might reasonably affect the borrower's rights, interests, or ability to receive the borrower's intended benefit from the residential mortgage loan;

(d) A mortgage broker must use reasonable care in performing duties; and

(e) A mortgage broker must provide an accounting to the borrower for all money and property received from the borrower.

(2) A mortgage broker may contract for or collect a fee for services rendered if the fee is disclosed to the borrower in advance of the provision of those services.

(3) The fiduciary duty in this section does not require a mortgage broker to offer or obtain access to loan products and services other than those that are available to the mortgage broker at the time of the transaction.

(4) The director must adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 2008 c 109 s 1.]